public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi pronomenali (takai ko èle no vanesente)
SFX Rl Y 41
SFX Rl 0 gel [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX Rl 0 gelo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX Rl 0 gela [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX Rl 0 geli [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX Rl 0 gele [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX Rl 0 lo [aeioòu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl àr arlo àr	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl ór orlo ór	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl ír irlo ír	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl 0 la [aeioòu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl àr arla àr	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl ór orla ór	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl ír irla ír	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl 0 li [aeioòu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl àr arli àr	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl ór orli ór	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl ír irli ír	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl 0 le [aeioòu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl àr arle àr	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl ór orle ór	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl ír irle ír	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+accusative
SFX Rl 0 mel [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 melo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 mela [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 meli [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 mele [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 sel [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 selo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 sela [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 seli [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 sele [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 tel [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 telo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 tela [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 teli [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 tele [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 vel [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 velo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 vela [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 veli [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX Rl 0 vele [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive

# vèrbi pronomenali (takai ko èle vanesente)
SFX R7 Y 20
SFX R7 0 geƚo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX R7 0 geƚa [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX R7 0 geƚi [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX R7 0 geƚe [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX R7 0 meƚo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 meƚa [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 meƚi [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 meƚe [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 seƚo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 seƚa [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 seƚi [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 seƚe [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 teƚo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 teƚa [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 teƚi [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 teƚe [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 veƚo [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 veƚa [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:singular+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 veƚi [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+masculine ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX R7 0 veƚe [aàeiíoòóu]r	is:plural+femenine ds:pronomenal+reflexive


# vèrbi pronomenali pal komandativo (destakai)
SFX S0 Y 56
SFX S0 a e-ge a	ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX S0 a e-gen a	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 a e-gin a	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 a e-gene a	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 a e-gine a	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 a e-me a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-men a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-mene a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-n a	ds:pronomenal+genitive
SFX S0 a e-ne a	ds:pronomenal+genitive
SFX S0 a e-se a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-sen a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-sene a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-te a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-ten a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-tene a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-ve a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-ven a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 a e-vene a	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-ge i	ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX S0 i e-gen i	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 i e-gin i	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 i e-gene i	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 i e-gine i	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 i e-me i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-men i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-mene i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-n i	ds:pronomenal+genitive
SFX S0 i e-ne i	ds:pronomenal+genitive
SFX S0 i e-se i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-sen i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-sene i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-te i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-ten i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-tene i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-ve i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-ven i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 i e-vene i	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -ge [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+locative
SFX S0 0 -gen [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 0 -gin [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 0 -gene [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 0 -gine [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+genitive+locative
SFX S0 0 -me [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -men [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -mene [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -n [aàèéiío]	ds:pronomenal+genitive
SFX S0 0 -ne [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+genitive
SFX S0 0 -se [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -sen [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -sene [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -te [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -tene [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -ve [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -ven [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
SFX S0 0 -vene [aàèéiíno]	ds:pronomenal+reflexive
