public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
xberlúxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:s
parbójer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:per
parbóɉer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:per
koncèñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7xD+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:kon
aparcéñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:a
koncéñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:kon
cúder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
intradíxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7xIxJxK	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:intra
intredíxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7xIxJxK	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:inter
xónxer/t1n1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7@0-0-1:0+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
soxónxer/t1n1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7@0-0-1:0+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:sub
evínser/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fínxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
fóter/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7+0^6	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
exíɉer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ex
tranxíjer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:trans
oklúder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ob
kòjer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7@0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kòñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
perkórer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:per
inkórxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
kréder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7.0^6	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kuérđer/t1c0c1l1P0PlR0Rl-1*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
lànguer/t1c0c1l1P0PlR0Rl	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
ƚànguer/t1c0c771P0P7R0R7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
stralúxer/t1c0c1l1P0PlR0Rl	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:stra
méter/t1n1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7@0-0-1^7^2.0^1	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kométer/t1n1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ko
mòlxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
mòver/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7.0*0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
òlder/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
abòrer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ab
vilipénder/t1c0c1l1n1P0PlR0Rl	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:vil
viƚipénder/t1c0c771P0P7R0R7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:vil
renpiànđer/t1c0c1l1P0PlR0Rl	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in dp:re
aplàuder/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ad
xustapòner/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:đusto
opòner/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ob
sorapòner/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:sora
poséder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
prénder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7:0.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
rèxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
erèđer/t1c0c1l1P0PlR0Rl	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ex
intarónper/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:inter
korónper/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:kon
insíster/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
susíster/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:sub
respónder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:re
korespònder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:re dp:ko
süàder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
tàxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
frainténder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in dp:fra
sotinténder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in dp:soto
parintènder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in dp:per
ténxer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7+0.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
kontèñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7xD+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:kon
apartéñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:per dp:ad
pertéñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7Vs	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:per
retór/R0RlR7N0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple st:retoler dp:re
tràr/R0RlR7N0@0-0-1:0.0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple st:tràer
sutràer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7xQ	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:sub
estràđer/t1c0c1l1P0PlR0Rl	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ex
intarséder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:inter
insènder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:in
sèrner/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7-0+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
prevéder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7+0	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:pre
ʼñèner/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple st:vèñer
intervèñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7xD	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:inter
intrevéñer/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:inter
parvèrter/t1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:per
divíder/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:de
soravíver/t1n1c0c1c7l171P0PlP7R0RlR7	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:sora
ravòlđer/t1c0c1l1P0PlR0Rl	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:ad dp:re
